Tennessee, session 114, SB2049.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-13-113, is amended by deleting
subdivisions (f)(2) and (f)(3).
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-17-1316, is amended by deleting
subdivision (a)(1)(B).
SECTION 3. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it.
SB2049
009729
- 1 -